src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON GOABBÁKGUOJMMELEX
+Acc:goabbák% guojm    PxReciDuShort ;
+Gen:goabbák% guojm    PxReciDuShort ;
+Ill:goabbák% guojmmás PxReciDuLong  ;
+Ine:goabbák% guojmen  PxReciDuLong  ;
+Ela:goabbák% guojmest PxReciDuLong  ;
+Com:goabbák% guojmijn PxReciDuLong  ;

+Acc+Err/MissingSpace:goabbák∑#guojm    PxReciDuShort ;
+Gen+Err/MissingSpace:goabbák∑#guojm    PxReciDuShort ;
+Ill+Err/MissingSpace:goabbák∑#guojmmás PxReciDuLong  ;
+Ine+Err/MissingSpace:goabbák∑#guojmen  PxReciDuLong  ;
+Ela+Err/MissingSpace:goabbák∑#guojmest PxReciDuLong  ;
+Com+Err/MissingSpace:goabbák∑#guojmijn PxReciDuLong  ;

LEXICON GUHTIKGUOJMMELEX
+Acc:guhtik% guojm    PxReciPlShort ;
+Gen:guhtik% guojm    PxReciPlShort ;
+Ill:guhtik% guojmmás PxReciPlLong  ;
+Ine:guhtik% guojmen  PxReciPlLong  ;
+Ela:guhtik% guojmest PxReciPlLong  ;
+Com:guhtik% guojmijn PxReciPlLong  ;

+Acc+Err/MissingSpace:guhtik∑#guojm    PxReciPlShort ;
+Gen+Err/MissingSpace:guhtik∑#guojm    PxReciPlShort ;
+Ill+Err/MissingSpace:guhtik∑#guojmmás PxReciPlLong  ;
+Ine+Err/MissingSpace:guhtik∑#guojmen  PxReciPlLong  ;
+Ela+Err/MissingSpace:guhtik∑#guojmest PxReciPlLong  ;
+Com+Err/MissingSpace:guhtik∑#guojmijn PxReciPlLong  ;

LEXICON PxReciDuShort
 +Du1:áma  K-VOW ;
 +Du2:áda  K-VOW ;
 +Du3:eska K-VOW ;

LEXICON PxReciPlShort 
 +Pl1:áma  K-VOW ;
 +Pl2:áda  K-VOW ;
 +Pl3:esa  K-VOW ;


LEXICON PxReciDuLong
 +Du1:imme  K-VOW ;
 +Du2:ihtte K-VOW ;
 +Du3:iska  K-VOW ;

LEXICON PxReciPlLong
 +Pl1:imme  K-VOW ;
 +Pl2:ihtte K-VOW ;
 +Pl3:isá   K-VOW ;
